Oklahoma, session 2026, SB866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1277.


UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES

Req. No. 726 Page 1


A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in


possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed


or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:


1. Any structure, building, or office space which is owned or


leased by a city, town, county, state, or federal governmental


authority for the purpose of conducting business with the public;


2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility,


or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,


prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,


except as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. Any public or private elementary or public or private


secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this


section;


4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during


a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;


5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless


allowed by the property owner;


6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and


7. Any property set aside by a county, city, town, public trust


with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state governmental


authority for an event that is secured with minimum-security minimum


security provisions. For purposes of this paragraph, a minimum-

Req. No. 726 Page 2


security minimum security provision consists of a location that is


secured utilizing the following:


a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight


(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and


is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized


entry,


b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,


commissioned peace officer, and


c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise


travel with their property through or by the metal


detector.


B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or


unconcealed firearm on the following properties:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county,


state, or federal governmental authority;


2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the


public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;


3. Any property adjacent to a structure, building, or office


space in which concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by


the provisions of this section;


4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state


governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife

Req. No. 726 Page 3


refuge, wildlife management area, or fairgrounds; provided, nothing


in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize any entry by a


person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed firearm into any


structure, building, office space, or event which is specifically


prohibited by the provisions of subsection A of this section;


5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or


secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether


attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be


stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor


vehicle is left unattended on school property; and


6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,


town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or


state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that


is without minimum-security minimum security provisions, as such


term is defined in paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section;


provided, the carry of firearms within said the permitted event area


shall be limited to concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise


authorized by the holder of the event permit.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or


subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or


allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A


of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect


of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license



Req. No. 726 Page 4


or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or


possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.


C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto


private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any


private school for transportation of students or teachers by a


person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the


private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a


weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle


used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or


willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school


that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on


private school property, a school bus, or a vehicle used by the


private school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries


arising from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this


subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative


Workers’ Compensation Act.


D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,


a A board of education of a public school district may adopt a


policy pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes to authorize the carrying of a concealed handgun onto


school property by school personnel specifically designated by the


board of education, provided such personnel either:



Req. No. 726 Page 5


1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for


in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes the


Oklahoma Security Guard and Private Investigator Act; or


2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided


for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.; or


3. a. Possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


b. Have successfully completed twenty-four (24) hours of


training to include a minimum of four (4) hours of


weapon retention training certified by the Council on


Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), and


c. Have demonstrated proficiency in handgun training and


campus-specific active shooter training as determined


by the appropriate law enforcement agency having


jurisdiction in that public school district.


In addition to any other continuing education requirements,


personnel authorized to carry pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be required to obtain biennial training to include,


but not be limited to, four (4) hours of CLEET-certified weapon


retention training, four (4) hours of campus-specific active shooter


training, and any other training as deemed necessary by the


appropriate law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in that


public school district. Required training may be provided by such



Req. No. 726 Page 6


law enforcement agency or by a privately contracted company that


offers the appropriate training.


A person authorized to carry pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall maintain the concealed firearm on his or her person


at all times while on school property.


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority


granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.


E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this


section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of


any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:


1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section


176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. A nonprofit entity,


an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not


openly carry a handgun on the property.


F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of


subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of


subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the


property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to


leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may


be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00).

Req. No. 726 Page 7


G. No person in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or who


is carrying or in possession of a firearm as otherwise permitted by


law or who is carrying or in possession of a machete, blackjack,


loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles shall be authorized to


carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or


metal knuckles into or upon any college, university, or technology


center school property, except as provided in this subsection. For


purposes of this subsection, the following property shall not be


construed to be college, university, or technology center school


property:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are


carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are not


removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or


technology center school property;


2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,


machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, hand chains, or metal knuckles


by college, university, or technology center school policy; and



Req. No. 726 Page 8


3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the


firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal


knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,


or technology center school property.


The college, university, or technology center school may notify


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a


violation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon


receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall


give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the


hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any


provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an


administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may


have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be


construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or


technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has


the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a


handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles from


possession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand


chain, or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2, and


of this subsection. Nothing contained in any provision of this

Req. No. 726 Page 9


subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of any college,


university, or technology center school in this state from taking


administrative action against any student for any violation of any


provision of this subsection.


H. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the


following:


1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a


firearm in the course of employment;


2. District judges, associate district judges, and special


district judges, who are in possession of a valid handgun license


issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act


and whose names appear on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of


employment within the courthouses of this state;


3. Private investigators with a firearms authorization when


acting in the course and scope of employment;


4. Elected officials An elected official of a county, who are


is in possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed


handgun when acting in the performance of his or her duties within


the courthouses of the county in which he or she was elected. The


provisions of this paragraph shall not allow the elected county


official to carry the handgun into a courtroom;



Req. No. 726 Page 10


5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of


the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a


concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment


within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.


Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff


from requiring additional instruction or training before granting


authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.


The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this


subsection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun


into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail, or any


other prisoner detention area; and


6. The board of county commissioners of any county may


authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the


course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds


surrounding the county courthouse.


I. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means any


automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, or motorcycle,


as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


equipped with a locked accessory container within or affixed to the


motorcycle.



Req. No. 726 Page 11


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1280.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1280.1.


POSSESSION OF FIREARM ON SCHOOL PROPERTY


A. It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her


possession on any public or private school property or while in any


school bus or vehicle used by any school for transportation of


students or teachers any firearm or weapon designated in Section


1272 of this title, except as provided in subsection C of this


section or as otherwise authorized by law.


B. For purposes of this section:


1. “School property” means any publicly owned property held for


purposes of elementary, secondary, or vocational-technical


education, and shall not include property owned by public school


districts or where such property is leased or rented to an


individual or corporation and used for purposes other than


educational;


2. “Private school” means a school that offers a course of


instruction for students in one or more grades from prekindergarten


through grade twelve and is not operated by a governmental entity;


and


3. “Motor vehicle” means any automobile, truck, minivan, or


sports utility vehicle.



Req. No. 726 Page 12


C. Firearms and weapons are allowed on school property and


deemed not in violation of subsection A of this section as follows:


1. A gun or knife designed for hunting or fishing purposes kept


in a privately owned vehicle and properly displayed or stored as


required by law, provided such vehicle containing said the gun or


knife is driven onto school property only to transport a student to


and from school and such vehicle does not remain unattended on


school property;


2. A gun or knife used for the purposes of participating in the


Oklahoma Department of Wildlife Conservation certified hunter


training education course or any other hunting, fishing, safety, or


firearms training courses, or a recognized firearms sports event,


team shooting program or competition, or living history reenactment,


provided the course or event is approved by the principal or chief


administrator of the school where the course or event is offered,


and provided the weapon is properly displayed or stored as required


by law pending participation in the course, event, program, or


competition;


3. Weapons in the possession of any peace officer or other


person authorized by law to possess a weapon in the performance of


his or her duties and responsibilities;


4. A concealed or unconcealed weapon carried onto private


school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any private


school for transportation of students or teachers by a person who is

Req. No. 726 Page 13


licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, provided a


policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the private


school that authorizes the possession of a weapon on private school


property or in any school bus or vehicle used by a private school.


Except for acts of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct,


a governing entity of a private school that adopts a policy which


authorizes the possession of a weapon on private school property, a


school bus, or a vehicle used by the private school shall be immune


from liability for any injuries arising from the adoption of the


policy. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to claims


pursuant to the Workers’ Compensation Code;


5. A gun, knife, bayonet, or other weapon in the possession of


a member of a veterans group, the national guard National Guard,


active military, the Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (ROTC), or


Junior ROTC, in order to participate in a ceremony, assembly, or


educational program approved by the principal or chief administrator


of a school or school district where the ceremony, assembly, or


educational program is being held; provided, however, the gun or


other weapon that uses projectiles is not loaded and is inoperable


at all times while on school property;


6. A handgun carried in a motor vehicle pursuant to a valid


handgun license authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act onto


property set aside by a public or private elementary or secondary


school for the use or parking of any vehicle; provided, however,

Req. No. 726 Page 14


said the handgun shall be stored and hidden from view in a locked


motor vehicle when the motor vehicle is left unattended on school


property; and


7. A concealed handgun carried onto public school property by


school personnel who have been designated by the board of education,


provided such personnel either:


a. possess a valid armed security guard license as


provided for in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or


b. hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as


provided for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


if a policy has been adopted by the board of education of the school


district that authorizes the carrying of a handgun onto public


school property by such personnel pursuant to subsection D of


Section 1277 of this title.


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority


granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.


D. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,


upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of


not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-149.2, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 726 Page 15


Section 5-149.2. A. The board of education of a public school


district may, through a majority vote of the board, designate adopt


a policy to authorize the carrying of a concealed handgun onto


school property by school personnel who have been issued a handgun


license pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act to attend an


specifically designated by the public school board of education,


provided such personnel:


1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for


in the Oklahoma Security Guard and Private Investigator Act;


2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided


for in Section 3311 of this title; or


3. a. Possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


b. Have successfully completed twenty-four (24) hours of


training including a minimum of four (4) hours of


weapon retention training certified by the Council on


Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), and


c. Have demonstrated proficiency in handgun training and


campus-specific active shooter training as determined


by the appropriate law enforcement agency having


jurisdiction in that public school district.


Ongoing continuing education and training shall be required of


any person authorized by the board of education to carry a concealed



Req. No. 726 Page 16


handgun pursuant to the provisions and requirements provided in


subsection D of Section 1277 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The board of education of a public school may designate


school personnel to attend an armed security guard training program,


as provided for in Section 1750.5 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, or a reserve peace officer certification program, as


provided for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title, provided and developed by the Council on Law Enforcement


Education and Training (CLEET). Nothing in this section shall be


construed to prohibit or limit the board of education of a school


district from requiring ongoing education and training.


B. C. Participation in either the armed security guard training


program or, the reserve peace officer certification program, or


training to carry a handgun as provided in paragraph 3 of subsection


A of this section shall be voluntary and shall not in any way be


considered a requirement for continued employment with the public


school district. The board of education of a public school district


shall have the final authority to determine and designate the school


personnel who will be authorized to obtain and use an armed security


guard license or reserve peace officer certification or participate


with a handgun license and required training components in


conjunction with their employment as school personnel.


C. D. The board of education of a public school district that


authorizes school personnel to participate in either the armed

Req. No. 726 Page 17


security guard program or, the reserve peace officer program, or the


training to carry a handgun as provided in paragraph 3 of subsection


A of this section may pay all necessary training, meal, and lodging


expenses associated with the training.


D. E. When carrying a firearm pursuant to the provisions of


this act section, the person shall at all times carry the firearm on


his or her person or the firearm shall be stored in a locked and


secure location.


E. F. Any public school personnel who have successfully


completed either armed security guard training, reserve peace


officer certification training, or training to carry a handgun as


provided in paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section and while


acting in good faith a reasonable and prudent manner shall not be


immune from subject to civil and criminal liability for any injury


resulting from the carrying of a handgun onto public school property


as provided for in this act section. Any board of education of a


public school district or participating local law enforcement agency


shall not be immune from subject to civil and criminal liability for


any injury resulting from any act committed by school personnel who


are designated to carry a concealed handgun on public school


property pursuant to the provisions of this act section.


F. G. In order to carry out the provisions of this section, the


board of education of a public school district is authorized to



Req. No. 726 Page 18


enter into a memorandum of understanding with local law enforcement


entities.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-726 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:53 AM































Req. No. 726 Page 19